tests/gk.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kaz.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "Back vowel {K}":
    бар<v><iv><ger_abs><nom> : барушылық
    бар<v><iv><ger_perf><nom> : барғандық

  "Back vowel {K} stays voiceless":
    бар<v><iv><ger_abs><abl> : барушылықтан
    бар<v><iv><ger_abs><dat> : барушылыққа
    бар<v><iv><ger_perf><abl> : барғандықтан
    бар<v><iv><ger_perf><dat> : барғандыққа

  "Back vowel {K} voices":
    бар<v><iv><ger_abs><px1sg><nom> : барушылығым
    бар<v><iv><ger_abs><px1sg><dat> : барушылығыма
    бар<v><iv><ger_perf><px1sg><nom> : барғандығым
    бар<v><iv><ger_perf><px1sg><dat> : барғандығыма


  "Front vowel {K}":
    бер<v><tv><ger_abs><nom> : берушілік
    бер<v><tv><ger_perf><nom> : бергендік

  "Front vowel {K} stays voiceless":
    бер<v><tv><ger_abs><abl> : берушіліктен
    бер<v><tv><ger_abs><dat> : берушілікке
    бер<v><tv><ger_perf><abl> : бергендіктен
    бер<v><tv><ger_perf><dat> : бергендікке

  "Front vowel {K} voices":
    бер<v><tv><ger_abs><px1sg><nom> : берушілігім
    бер<v><tv><ger_abs><px1sg><dat> : берушілігіме
    бер<v><tv><ger_perf><px1sg><nom> : бергендігім
    бер<v><tv><ger_perf><px1sg><dat> : бергендігіме
